California, session 20252026, AB1792.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 51900.3 is added to the Education Code, to read:51900.3. (a) During the next revision of the publication “Health Framework for California Public Schools” (health framework), the Instructional Quality Commission shall consider including, and recommending for adoption by the state board, specific content related to sexual health instruction to educate pupils about dating abuse and digital violence.(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), “sexual health education” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(1) The knowledge and skills necessary to understand digital and online safety, including the risks associated with nonconsensual intimate imagery, deepfakes, online grooming, sextortion, stalking, and the misuse of generative artificial intelligence.(2) Age-appropriate, inclusive instruction on legal rights, protections, and support resources related to interpersonal violence, including information on restraining orders and how to seek assistance from trusted adults, school staff, and community resources.(3) Instruction inclusive of, and responsive to, the experiences of LGBTQIA+ and gender diverse pupils, who are disproportionately impacted by dating violence and technology-facilitated abuse.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________